Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8610.02
Vocational rehabilitation counseling for the blind; certified vocational rehabilitation counselor for the blind; certification required; qualifications; continuing competency requirements.

(1) No person shall engage in vocational rehabilitation counseling for the blind or hold himself or herself out as a certified vocational rehabilitation counselor for the blind in the state unless he or she is certified for such purpose by the commission.

(2) A certified vocational rehabilitation counselor for the blind is not a mental health practitioner.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, a certified vocational rehabilitation counselor for the blind shall have the following qualifications:

(a) A bachelor's degree from an appropriate educational program approved by the executive director of the commission;

(b) Six hundred hours of intensive training under sleep shades at the commission's orientation training center; and

(c) Completion of appropriate training as approved by the executive director.

(4) Each certified vocational rehabilitation counselor for the blind shall, in the period since his or her certificate was issued or last renewed, complete continuing competency requirements as set forth by the commission under the executive director's approval.

(5) The commission may waive some or all of the requirements of subsection (3) of this section for any person engaged in rehabilitation counseling for the blind on or before September 1, 2007.

Laws 2007, LB445, § 4.